Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.360

Health care.

(1) The following health care information is exempt from disclosure under this chapter:

(a) Information obtained by the pharmacy quality assurance commission as provided in RCW 69.45.090;

(b) Information obtained by the pharmacy quality assurance commission or the department of health and its representatives as provided in RCW 69.41.044, 69.41.280, and 18.64.420;

(c) Information and documents created specifically for, and collected and maintained by a quality improvement committee under RCW 43.70.510, 70.230.080, or 70.41.200, or by a peer review committee under RCW 4.24.250, or by a quality assurance committee pursuant to RCW 74.42.640 or 18.20.390, or by a hospital, as defined in RCW 43.70.056, for reporting of health care-associated infections under RCW 43.70.056, a notification of an incident under RCW 70.56.040(5), and reports regarding adverse events under RCW 70.56.020(2)(b), regardless of which agency is in possession of the information and documents;

(d)(i) Proprietary financial and commercial information that the submitting entity, with review by the department of health, specifically identifies at the time it is submitted and that is provided to or obtained by the department of health in connection with an application for, or the supervision of, an antitrust exemption sought by the submitting entity under RCW 43.72.310;

(ii) If a request for such information is received, the submitting entity must be notified of the request. Within ten business days of receipt of the notice, the submitting entity shall provide a written statement of the continuing need for confidentiality, which shall be provided to the requester. Upon receipt of such notice, the department of health shall continue to treat information designated under this subsection (1)(d) as exempt from disclosure;

(iii) If the requester initiates an action to compel disclosure under this chapter, the submitting entity must be joined as a party to demonstrate the continuing need for confidentiality;

(e) Records of the entity obtained in an action under RCW 18.71.300 through 18.71.340;

(f) Complaints filed under chapter 18.130 RCW after July 27, 1997, to the extent provided in RCW 18.130.095(1);

(g) Information obtained by the department of health under chapter 70.225 RCW;

(h) Information collected by the department of health under chapter 70.245 RCW except as provided in RCW 70.245.150;

(i) Cardiac and stroke system performance data submitted to national, state, or local data collection systems under RCW 70.168.150(2)(b);

(j) All documents, including completed forms, received pursuant to a wellness program under RCW 41.04.362, but not statistical reports that do not identify an individual;

(k) Data and information exempt from disclosure under RCW 43.371.040;

(l) Medical information contained in files and records of members of retirement plans administered by the department of retirement systems or the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 retirement board, as provided to the department of retirement systems under RCW 41.04.830; and

(m) Data submitted to the data integration platform under RCW 71.24.908.

(2) Chapter 70.02 RCW applies to public inspection and copying of health care information of patients.

(3)(a) Documents related to infant mortality reviews conducted pursuant to RCW 70.05.170 are exempt from disclosure as provided for in RCW 70.05.170(3).

(b)(i) If an agency provides copies of public records to another agency that are exempt from public disclosure under this subsection (3), those records remain exempt to the same extent the records were exempt in the possession of the originating entity.

(ii) For notice purposes only, agencies providing exempt records under this subsection (3) to other agencies may mark any exempt records as "exempt" so that the receiving agency is aware of the exemption, however whether or not a record is marked exempt does not affect whether the record is actually exempt from disclosure.

(4) Information and documents related to maternal mortality reviews conducted pursuant to RCW 70.54.450 are confidential and exempt from public inspection and copying.

(5) Patient health care information contained in reports submitted under RCW 71.24.847(2) are confidential and exempt from public inspection.

[ 2024 c 366 s 19; 2023 sp.s. c 1 s 23; 2020 c 323 s 2; 2016 c 238 s 2; 2014 c 223 s 17; 2013 c 19 s 47. Prior: 2010 c 128 s 3; 2010 c 52 s 6; prior: 2009 c 1 s 24 (Initiative Measure No. 1000, approved November 4, 2008); ( 2009 c 1 s 23 (Initiative Measure No. 1000, approved November 4, 2008) expired July 1, 2009); 2008 c 136 s 5; (2008 c 136 s 4 expired July 1, 2009); prior: 2007 c 273 s 25; 2007 c 261 s 4; 2007 c 259 s 49; prior: 2006 c 209 s 9; 2006 c 8 s 112; 2005 c 274 s 416.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2024 c 366: See note following RCW 71.24.847.

Finding—2014 c 223: See note following RCW 41.05.690.

Findings—Intent—2010 c 52: See note following RCW 70.168.015.

Expiration date—2009 c 1 (Initiative Measure No. 1000) s 23: "Section 23 of this act expires July 1, 2009." [ 2009 c 1 s 31 (Initiative Measure No. 1000, approved November 4, 2008).]

Short title—Effective dates—2009 c 1 (Initiative Measure No. 1000): See RCW 70.245.901 and 70.245.903.

Effective date—2008 c 136 s 5: "Section 5 of this act takes effect July 1, 2009." [ 2008 c 136 s 7.]

Expiration date—2008 c 136 s 4: "Section 4 of this act expires July 1, 2009." [ 2008 c 136 s 6.]

Effective date—Implementation—2007 c 273: See RCW 70.230.900 and 70.230.901.

Findings—2007 c 261: See note following RCW 43.70.056.

Subheadings not law—2007 c 259: See note following RCW 7.70.060.

Effective date—2006 c 8 ss 112 and 210: "Sections 112 and 210 of this act take effect July 1, 2006." [ 2006 c 8 s 405.]

Findings—Intent—Part headings and subheadings not law—Severability—2006 c 8: See notes following RCW 5.64.010.

Basic health plan—Confidentiality: RCW 70.47.150.